Washington statutes.
RCW 18.83.110

Privileged communications. (Effective until October 1, 2025.)

Confidential communications between a client and a psychologist shall be privileged against compulsory disclosure to the same extent and subject to the same conditions as confidential communications between attorney and client, but this exception is subject to the limitations under RCW 71.05.217 (6) and (7).

[ 2020 c 302 s 116; 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 414; 2005 c 504 s 706; 1989 c 271 s 303; 1987 c 439 s 12; 1965 c 70 s 11; 1955 c 305 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2016 sp.s. c 29: See note following RCW 71.05.760.

Short title—Right of action—2016 sp.s. c 29: See notes following RCW 71.05.010.

Findings—Intent—Severability—Application—Construction—Captions, part headings, subheadings not law—Adoption of rules—Effective dates—2005 c 504: See notes following RCW 71.05.027.

Alphabetization—Correction of references—2005 c 504: See note following RCW 71.05.020.

Severability—1989 c 271: See note following RCW 9.94A.510.

PDFRCW 18.83.110

Privileged communications. (Effective October 1, 2025.)

Confidential communications between a client and a psychologist or licensed psychological associate shall be privileged against compulsory disclosure to the same extent and subject to the same conditions as confidential communications between attorney and client, but this exception is subject to the limitations under RCW 71.05.217 (6) and (7).

[ 2024 c 371 s 6; 2020 c 302 s 116; 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 414; 2005 c 504 s 706; 1989 c 271 s 303; 1987 c 439 s 12; 1965 c 70 s 11; 1955 c 305 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2024 c 371 ss 1-12, 14, and 16: See note following RCW 18.19.020.

Rule making—2024 c 371 ss 1-16: See note following RCW 18.83.020.

Effective dates—2016 sp.s. c 29: See note following RCW 71.05.760.

Short title—Right of action—2016 sp.s. c 29: See notes following RCW 71.05.010.

Findings—Intent—Severability—Application—Construction—Captions, part headings, subheadings not law—Adoption of rules—Effective dates—2005 c 504: See notes following RCW 71.05.027.

Alphabetization—Correction of references—2005 c 504: See note following RCW 71.05.020.

Severability—1989 c 271: See note following RCW 9.94A.510.